Hawaii statutes.
[§46-163] Conditions for the transfer of
development rights. In addition to any existing power, duty, and authority
of the counties to regulate land uses by planning or zoning, the counties are
hereby authorized to transfer and regulate the transfer of development rights,
subject to the conditions set forth under this part, as well as planning laws,
zoning laws, and any other conditions as the legislative body of each county
deems necessary and appropriate. The purpose of providing for transfer of development
rights shall be to:

(1) Protect the natural, scenic, and agricultural
qualities of open lands;

(2) Enhance sites and areas of special character or
special historical, cultural, aesthetic, or economic interest or value; and

(3) Enable and encourage flexibility of design and
careful management of land in recognition of land as a basic and valuable
natural resource. [L 1998, c 296, pt of §1]

Revision Note

Subsection designation deleted pursuant to §23G-15(1).

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next